District of Columbia statutes.
44-1051.10

Change in ownership or operation.

A nurse staffing agency shall notify the Department of any change in ownership, or in business name, address, telephone number, or responsible party, as required by § 44-1051.04, no later than 30 days after the change.

March 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-74, § 10, 50 DCR 10914